New York, session 2025-2026, A11656.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 42 to read as follows: 3 (42) Every policy which provides hospital, surgical, medical or major 4 medical coverage shall provide coverage to screen for cytomegalovirus in 5 pregnant persons. 6 § 2. Subsection (k) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 7 adding a new paragraph 24 to read as follows: 8 (24) Every policy which provides hospital, surgical, medical or major 9 medical coverage shall provide coverage to screen for cytomegalovirus in 10 pregnant persons. 11 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 12 subsection (yy) to read as follows: 13 (yy) Every policy which provides hospital, surgical, medical or major 14 medical coverage shall provide coverage to screen for cytomegalovirus in 15 pregnant persons. 16 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall apply to all 17 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered or amended on 18 or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16125-01-6